District of Columbia, session 26, PR26-0375.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Food & Friends Property Tax Exemption Emergency Declaration
Resolution of 2025”.
Sec. 2. (a) There exists an immediate need to amend the tax status of property located at
219 Riggs Road, NE to ensure that the nearly 40-year-old non-profit Food & Friends can
continue to serve District residents and can expand its services through an expansion of their
operations.
(b) Food & Friends has made their home in the District since 1988 and was created to
serve District residents who have HIV/AIDS, cancer and other serious illnesses that limit their
ability to provide nourishment for themselves.
(c) Food & Friends is currently planning an expansion to allow them to stay in the city
for many years into the future, and to continue to provide home-delivered meals and groceries
throughout the District that are medically tailored to clients’ needs.

(e) In 2024, Food & Friends delivered 1,054,585 meals to 3,039 District residents -- the
most ever in its history.
(f) The property tax exemption that Food & Friends obtained in 2006 plays a vital role in
allowing the organization to provide many District of Columbia residents with important
nutrition services on which they have come to rely. Without the exemption, Food & Friends’
ability to operate would be seriously jeopardized and thousands of District residents would be
negatively impacted -- particularly in light of widespread food insecurity and uncertainty related
to federal nutrition programs.
(g) This emergency is necessary to support Food & Friends’ long-term commitment to
the District and to those residents who are unable to secure nutritious meals for themselves in
any other way.
Sec. 3. The Council of the District of Columbia finds that the circumstances in section 2
constitute emergency circumstances making it necessary that the Food & Friends Property Tax
Exemption Emergency Amendment Act of 2025 be adopted after a single reading.
Sec. 4. This resolution shall take effect immediately.